Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER 15D]

UNIFORM MILITARY AND OVERSEAS VOTERS ACT

Section

15D-1 Short title

15D-2 Definitions

15D-3 Elections covered

15D-4 Role of
chief election officer

15D-5 Overseas voter's registration address

15D-6 Methods of registering to vote

15D-7 Methods of applying for military-overseas
ballot

15D-8 Timeliness and scope of application for

military-overseas ballot

15D-9 Transmission of unvoted ballots

15D-10 Receipt of voted ballot

15D-11 Declaration

15D-12 Federal write-in absentee ballot

15D-13 Confirmation of receipt of application and
voted

ballot

15D-14 Use of voter's electronic-mail address

15D-15 Publication of election notice

15D-16 Prohibition of nonsubstantive requirements

15D-17 Equitable relief

15D-18 Relation to Electronic Signatures in
Global and

National Commerce Act

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next